src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Interrogative
gie+Pron+Interr: GIE ;
gie+Pron+Rel: GIE ;
mij+Pron+Interr: MIJ ;
mij+Pron+Rel: MIJ ;
guhte+Pron+Rel: GUHTE ;
guhte+Pron+Interr:  GUHTE ;
mij+Pron+Indef: MIJ ;
gie+Pron+Indef: GIE ;

gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:gåabpa FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:gåabpam FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:gåabpan FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:gåabpese FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:gåabpesne FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+Attr:gåabpene # "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:gåabpeste FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+Attr:gåabpede # "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:gåabpine FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;

gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:gåabpetje FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:gåabpetjem FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:gåabpetjen FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:gåabpatjasse FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:gåabpatjisnie FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:gåabpatjistie FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:gåabpatjinie FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;


gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:gåabpa        FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc:gåabpam       FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen:gåabpan       FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill:gåabpese      FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:gåabpesne     FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine+Attr:gåabpene # 		"hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:gåabpeste 	 FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela+Attr:gåabpede # 		"hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com:gåabpine 	 FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;

gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:gåabpetje     FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc:gåabpetjem    FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen:gåabpetjen    FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill:gåabpatjasse  FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:gåabpatjisnie FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:gåabpatjistie FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com:gåabpatjinie  FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ; !?





LEXICON GUHTE
+Sg+Nom:guhte FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:guht FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:guhtem FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:guhten FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:guhtese FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine:guhtesne FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine+Attr:guhtene # ;
+Sg+Ela:guhteste FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela+Attr:guhtede # ;
+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:guhtine FINAL1 ; !? !
+Pl+Nom:guhth FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:guht FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:guhtide FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:guhti FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:guhtide FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:guhtine FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:guhtijste FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:guhtigujmie FINAL1 ; !? !

LEXICON GIE
+Sg+Nom:gie FINAL1 ;
!+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:gïe FINAL1 ; !spellrelax
+Sg+Acc:gïem FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:geam FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:gïen FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:gean FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:gïese FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:gease FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:gïeh FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:geah FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:geaj FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:geajgujmie FINAL1 ;
:gie INTERR ; !

LEXICON MIJ
+Sg+Nom:mij FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:maam FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:maab FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:man FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:mïsse FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:man FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:masse FINAL1 ;
+Ess:mannasinie FINAL1 ;
+Ess+Err/Orth:mannasine FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:mah FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:maj FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:mej FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:majgujmie FINAL1 ;
:me INTERR ;


LEXICON INTERR
+Sg+Ine:snie 		FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine+Attr:nnie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:stie        FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela+Attr:htie        FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:jnie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:jtie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:j           FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:jtie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:jnie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:jstie       FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:jgujmie     FINAL1 ;

!! ## Indefinite pronouns
!    -------------------
!    -------------------
!    -------------------

LEXICON indeven-e !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg-e ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl-e ;
+Pron+Indef: indess ;

LEXICON indeven-a !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg-a ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl-a ;
+Pron+Indef: indess ;


!! ## kongruensContlex

!! ### muvhtiecase

LEXICON muvhtiecase !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Indef+Sg: muvhtiesg ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: muvhtiepl ;

LEXICON muvhtiesg !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:ie FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ie%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ie%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>este FINAL1 ; !Magga&Magga
+Ill+Attr:ie%>n # ; !utan attr også?
+Ine+Attr:%>ine # ;
+Ine+Attr+Use/NG:%>ene # ; ! gellene lehkesne - på många ställen. Example in Åarjelsaemien 6 (2000:6).
+Ela+Attr:%>ide # ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;

LEXICON muvhtiepl !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:ieh FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ie%>j FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Attr:ide # ;
+Ill:ide FINAL1 ;	   ! mt
+Ine:ine FINAL1 ;	   ! mt
+Ela:ijste FINAL1 ;	   ! mt
+Com:ijgujmie FINAL1 ; ! mt


!! ### naaken

LEXICON naakenlex !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/NG: FINAL1 ;
+Pron+Indef+Attr:e FINAL1 ; ! mt
indodd ;
! XXX Sjekk desse tre formene. Er det rett?
! Ei spesiell attributtform heller enn td. 2x gujmie
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>^DISIMPi FINAL1 ; ! mt
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+Attr:%>^DISIMPi FINAL1 ; ! mt
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+Attr:%>^DISIMPi FINAL1 ; ! mt


LEXICON indodd   !!= * @CODE@
               ! This lexicon cannot be removed
               ! before lexica pointing here
               ! get another contlex!
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg_odd ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl_odd ;
+Pron+Indef: indess_odd ;

LEXICON indsg_odd  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:e^DISIMP FINAL1 ;
+Acc:e%>^DISIMPm FINAL1 ;
+Gen:e%>^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>asse FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+Ine:%>isnie FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>istie FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indpl_odd  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:%>^DISIMPh FINAL1 ;
+Acc:%>idie FINAL1 ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:%>^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>idie FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>inie FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijstie FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indess_odd  !!= * @CODE@
+Ess:%>inie FINAL1 ;



LEXICON ind_noninfl  !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Indef+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;



!! ### Inflecting even indefinites
!   - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indsg-e  !!= * @CODE@
indsg-e-nom ;
indsg-e-obl ;

LEXICON indsg-e-nom
+Nom:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indsg-e-obl
+Acc:e%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:e%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Attr:e%>n # ;
+Ill:e%>se FINAL1 ;
+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
+Ine+Attr:e%>ne # ;
+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
+Ela+Attr:e%>de # ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indsg-a  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:a FINAL1 ;
+Acc:a%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:a%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill:e%>se FINAL1 ;
+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
+Ine+Attr:e%>ne # ;
+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;



LEXICON indpl-e  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:%>h FINAL1 ;
+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:%>i FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indpl-a  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:a%>h FINAL1 ;
!+Nom:a%>ah FINAL1 ; !XXX check
+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:a%>j FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ;
+Com:a%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;


LEXICON indess  !!= * @CODE@
+Ess:%>ine FINAL1 ;


LEXICON indcoll   !!= * @CODE@
+Pron+Coll+Pl: indpl_odd ;









!! ## Reflexive pronouns
!    ------------------
!    ------------------
!    ------------------


LEXICON Reflexive !!= * @CODE@

jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:jïjtje FINAL1 ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:jeetje FINAL1 ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:ijtje FINAL1 ;

dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:altemse FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:altese FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG:elties FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG:eltie FINAL1 ;

jïjtje+Pron+Refl:jïjtj OBLREFL ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl:jïjt OBLREFL-NONPAL ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Err/Orth:jïjtj OBLREFL-NONPAL ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Use/NG:jïj OBLREFL-NONPAL2 ; !
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Use/NG:jïjt OBLREFL-NONPAL2 ; !LA også denne finnes i korp
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom:jïjtjh FINAL1 ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom:jïjtjh FINAL1 ;

LEXICON Demonstrative   !!= * @CODE@
          gaajhke+Pron+Dem+Sg:gaajhk    indsg-e        ;
          gaajhke+Pron+Dem+Pl:gaajhk    indpl-e        ;
             gaajhke+Pron+Dem:gaajhk    indess         ;
LEXICON Indefinite   !!= * @CODE@
guhte+Pron+Indef: GUHTE ;
abpe ind_noninfl "hele" ; !probably does not have inflection, so it was removed
dovnesh:dovnes indcoll "alle" ; ! check this
eatjah:eatj indeven-a "annen, de andre" ;
eatjah:eatj indeven-e "annen, de andre" ;
fïereguhte:fïereguht indeven-e "hver og en" ;
fïereguhte+Use/NG:fïere-guht indeven-e "hver og en" ; ! MMM
feareguhte:feareguht indeven-e "hver og en" ; ! MMM
feareguhte+Use/NG:feare-guht indeven-e "hver og en" ; ! MMM
fïerhte:fïerht indeven-e "hver, hverthver" ;
fïerhte+Err/Orth:fïert indeven-e "hver, hverthver" ;
gaajhke:gaajhk indeven-e "alle" ;
gaajhkesh:gaajhkes indcoll "alle sammen" ;
gaajhkesh+Err/Orth:gaajhks indcoll "alle sammen" ;
gallesh:gallas indcoll "mange sammen" ;
geahken+Pron+Indef:geahk indsg-e-obl ;
geahken+Pron+Indef:geahk indpl-e ;
geahkese:geahkes indodd ;
gille:gill indeven-e "noen få" ;
gillesh:gilles indcoll "noen få sammen" ;
gåabpatjahkh:gåabpatjahk indeven-e "både" ;
gåabpatjahkh+Err/Orth:gåabpahtjahk indeven-e "både" ;
jeatjebe:jeatjab indodd "en annen, noe annet, flt. jeatjebh andre" ;
jeene:jeen indeven-e "mange, mye" ;
jeenje:jeenj indeven-e "mange, mye" ; !uncertain if this word can be inflected in all these cases
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef+Pl:jeenjemes indpl-e "de fleste" ;
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef:jeenjemes indess ;
jeenjesh:jeenjes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
jienebe:jienieb indodd "flere" ;
jïenesh+Err/Orth:jienes indcoll "mange sammen" ; !
jïjnjesh+Err/Orth:jijnjes indcoll "mange sammen" ; !
jïenesh:jïenes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
jïjnje:jïjnj indeven-e "mange, mye" ;
jïjnjesh:jïjnjes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
muvhte:muvht indeven-e "noen" ;
muvhte+Err/Orth:muvht muvhtiecase "noen" ;
måadtesh:måadtas indcoll "mangen" ;
muvhtesh:muvhtes indcoll "mangen" ;
måedtie:måedt muvhtiecase "mange" ;
gellie:gell muvhtiecase "mange" ;
naakede ind_noninfl ; ! no inflection?
naakene:naaken naakenlex "noen, noe" ; !this must be pointed towards another lexicon due to it being three-syllabic
naakene+Err/Orth:naagen naakenlex ;
naan ind_noninfl "noen, noe" ;
seamma ind_noninfl "samme" ; !XXX
såamesh:såamas indcoll "noen, noe" ;
såamesh+Err/Orth:såames indcoll "noen, noe" ; !
såemies ind_noninfl "noen, noe" ;
åbpe ind_noninfl "hele" ; !probably does not have inflection, so it was removed
